Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 16 New England Interstate Water Pollution Control Commission

46-16-1.
Interstate compact authorized — Text of compact.

The commission on interstate cooperation, acting with and through the office of the attorney general, is hereby directed to negotiate with the proper authorities of the states of Maine, New Hampshire, Vermont, Massachusetts, and Connecticut a compact in substantially the following form, which is hereby ratified:

NEW ENGLAND INTERSTATE WATER
POLLUTION CONTROL COMPACT

Whereas, the growth of population and the development of the territory of the New England states has resulted in serious pollution of certain interstate streams, ponds and lakes, and of tidal waters ebbing and flowing past the boundaries of two (2) or more states; and

Whereas, such pollution constitutes a menace to the health, welfare and economic prosperity of the people living in such area; and

Whereas, the abatement of existing pollution and the control of future pollution in the interstate waters of the New England area are of prime importance to the people and can best be accomplished through the co-operation of the New England states in the establishment of an interstate agency to work with the states in the field of pollution abatement;

Now, therefore, the states of Connecticut, Maine, Massachusetts, New Hampshire, Rhode Island and Vermont do agree and are bound as follows:

ARTICLE I

It is agreed between the signatory states that the provisions of this compact shall apply to streams, ponds and lakes which are contiguous to two (2) or more signatory states or which flow through two (2) or more signatory states or which have a tributary contiguous to two (2) or more signatory states or flowing through two (2) or more signatory states, and also shall apply to tidal waters ebbing and flowing past the boundaries of two (2) states.

ARTICLE II

There is hereby created the New England interstate water pollution control commission (hereinafter referred to as
“the commission”
) which shall be a body corporate and politic, having the powers, duties and jurisdiction herein enumerated and such other and additional powers as shall be conferred upon it by the act or acts of a signatory state concurred in by the others.

ARTICLE III

The commission shall consist of five (5) commissioners from each signatory state, each of whom shall be a resident voter of the state from which he or she is appointed. The commissioners shall be chosen in the manner and for the terms provided by law of the state from which they shall be appointed. For each state there shall be on the commission a member representing the state health department, a member representing the state water pollution control board (if such exists), and, except where a state in its enabling legislation decides that the best interests of the state will be otherwise served, a member representing municipal interests, a member representing industrial interests, and a member representing an agency acting for fisheries or conservation.

ARTICLE IV

The commission shall annually elect from its members a chairperson and vice chairperson and shall appoint and at its pleasure remove or discharge such officers. It may appoint and employ a secretary who shall be a professional engineer versed in water pollution and may employ such stenographic or clerical employees as shall be necessary, and at its pleasure remove or discharge such employees. It shall adopt a seal and suitable bylaws and shall promulgate rules and regulations for its management and control. It may maintain an office for the transaction of its business and may meet at any time or place within the signatory states. Meetings shall be held at least twice each year. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, but no action of the commission imposing any obligations on any signatory state or on any municipal agency or subdivision thereof or on any person, firm or corporation therein shall be binding unless a majority of the members from such signatory state shall have voted in favor thereof. Where meetings are planned to discuss matters relevant to problems of water pollution control affecting only certain of the signatory states, the commission may vote to authorize special meetings of the commissioners of the states especially concerned. The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements and shall make an annual report to the governor and the legislature of each signatory state setting forth in detail the operations and transactions conducted by it pursuant to this compact, and shall make recommendations for any legislative action deemed by it advisable, including amendments to the statutes of the signatory states which may be necessary to carry out the intent and purposes of this compact. The commission shall not incur any obligations for salaries, office, administrative, traveling or other expenses prior to the allotment of funds by the signatory states adequate to meet the same; nor shall the commission pledge the credit of any of the signatory states. Each state reserves the right to provide hereafter by law for the examination and audit of the accounts of the commission. The commission shall appoint a treasurer who may be a member of the commission, and disbursements by the commission shall be valid only when authorized by the commission and when vouchers therefor have been signed by the secretary and countersigned by the treasurer. The secretary shall be custodian of the records of the commission with authority to attest to and certify such records or copies thereof.

ARTICLE V

It is recognized, owing to such variable factors as location, size, character and flow and the many varied uses of the waters subject to the terms of this compact, that no single standard of sewage and waste treatment and no single standard of quality of receiving waters is practical and that the degree of treatment of sewage and industrial wastes should take into account the classification of the receiving waters according to present and proposed highest use, such as for drinking water supply, industrial and agricultural uses, bathing and other recreational purposes, maintenance and propagation of fish life, shellfish culture, navigation and disposal of wastes.

The commission shall establish reasonable physical, chemical and bacteriological standards of water quality satisfactory for various classifications of use. It is agreed that each of the signatory states through appropriate agencies will prepare a classification of its interstate waters in entirety or by portions according to present and proposed highest use and for this purpose technical experts employed by state departments of health and state water pollution control agencies are authorized to confer on questions relating to classification of interstate waters affecting two (2) or more states. Each signatory state agrees to submit its classification of its interstate waters to the commission for approval. It is agreed that after such approval all signatory states through their appropriate state health departments and water pollution control agencies will work to establish programs of treatment of sewage and industrial wastes which will meet standards established by the commission for classified waters. The commission may from time to time make such changes in definitions of classifications and in standards as may be required by changed conditions or as may be necessary for uniformity.

ARTICLE VI

Each of the signatory states pledges to provide for the abatement of existing pollution and for the control of future pollution of interstate inland and tidal waters as described in Article I, and to put and maintain the waters thereof in a satisfactory condition consistent with the highest classified use of each body of water.

ARTICLE VII

Nothing in this compact shall be construed to repeal or prevent the enactment of any legislation or prevent the enforcement of any requirement by any signatory state imposing any additional condition or restriction to further lessen the pollution of waters within its jurisdiction. Nothing herein contained shall affect or abate any action now pending brought by any governmental board or body created by or existing under any of the signatory states.

ARTICLE VIII

The signatory states agree to appropriate for the salaries, office, administrative, travel and other expenses such sum or sums as shall be recommended by the commission. The state of Massachusetts obligates itself only to the extent of six thousand five hundred dollars ($6,500) in any one year, the state of Connecticut only to the extent of three thousand dollars ($3,000) in any one year, the state of Rhode Island only to the extent of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) in any one year, and the states of New Hampshire, Maine, and Vermont each only to the extent of one thousand dollars ($1,000) in any one year.

ARTICLE IX

Should any part of this compact be held to be contrary to the constitution of any signatory state or of the United States, all other parts thereof shall continue to be in full force and effect.

ARTICLE X

The commission is authorized to discuss with appropriate state agencies in New York state questions of pollution of waters which flow into the New England area from New York state or vice versa and to further the establishment of agreements on pollution abatement to promote the interests of the New York and New England areas.

Whenever the commission by majority vote of the members of each signatory state shall have given its approval and the state of New York shall have taken the necessary action to do so, the state of New York shall be a party to this compact for the purpose of controlling and abating the pollution of waterways common to New York and the New England states signatory to this compact but excluding the waters under the jurisdiction of the interstate sanitation commission (New York, New Jersey and Connecticut).

ARTICLE XI

This compact shall become effective immediately upon the adoption of the compact by any two (2) contiguous states of New England but only insofar as applies to those states and upon approval by federal law. Thereafter upon ratification by other contiguous states, it shall also become effective as to those states.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1838, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1901, §§ 3, 4; G.L. 1956, §

46-16-1

.

46-16-1.1.
Reaffirmation of support.

This state reaffirms its support of the cooperative approach to the abatement and control of water pollution as embodied in the New England Interstate Water Pollution Control Compact. In view of the increases in population concentrations, the growing need of industry and agriculture for water of reasonable quality, and the quality requirements of water based recreation and other uses, the New England interstate water pollution control commission shall develop and maintain its programs, including research on water quality problems, at such levels, including, to the extent necessary, levels above those originally provided when this state first enacted the compact, as may be appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 47, § 1.

46-16-1.2.
Personnel authorizations.

In addition to the minimal personnel authorizations contained in article IV of the New England Interstate Water Pollution Control Compact, the commission may employ such engineering, technical, and other professional, secretarial, and clerical personnel as the proper administration and functioning of the commission may require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 47, § 1.

46-16-1.3.
Concurrence in additional powers.

This state hereby concurs in the conferring of any powers or duties on the New England interstate water pollution control commission by other states, in addition to those conferred by provisions of the New England Interstate Water Pollution Control Compact. This concurrence is pursuant to article II of that compact.

The concurrence is subject to the following limitations:

Unless this state specifically confers a power or duty on the commission, other than one conferred by the compact itself, no financial or other burden or duties shall be placed upon this state, or any agency, officer, or subdivision thereof by reason of the conferring or exercise of the power or duty. At any time the governor shall have the power to make inquiry of the commission and to examine its books and records in order to ascertain the state of compliance with this chapter.

The rights, privileges, and responsibilities of this state with respect to the New England Interstate Water Pollution Control Compact and the commission established thereby, shall not be limited or impaired.

The commission shall include in its annual report to the governor and the legislature of this state a full account of any additional powers or duties administered by it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 47, § 1.

46-16-2.
Appointment of commissioners — Expenses — Powers and duties.

The governor shall appoint five (5) commissioners to the New England interstate water pollution control commission, who shall serve at the pleasure of the governor, one of whom shall represent the department of health and one of whom shall represent the department of environmental management. The commissioners shall serve without compensation, but shall be paid their actual expenses incurred and incident to the performance of their duties. The commissioners shall have the powers and duties and be subject to the limitations set forth in §

46-16-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1901, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-16-2

; P.L. 1977, ch. 182, § 5.

46-16-3.
Development of training standards.

The New England interstate water pollution control commission, hereinafter called
“the commission”
, may develop standards for the training, educational, and experience requirements for operating personnel necessary to the proper operation of sewage and other waste treatment plants.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 26, § 1.

46-16-4.
Issuance of certificates to employees of treatment plants.

The commission may administer programs of training and certification for personnel, and may make classifications thereof. Any certificate issued by the commission shall be accepted by this state and all agencies and subdivisions thereof as conclusive evidence that the holder has the training, education, and experience necessary for certification for the class of position or responsibility described therein. The director of the department of environmental management may impose and administer any other requirements for certification within any applicable provisions of law, but it shall not reexamine or reinvestigate the applicant for a certificate with respect to his or her training, education, or experience qualifications.

The commission shall keep a record of all certificates issued by it, and in response to any inquiry concerning such a certificate, the commission shall inform the inquirer concerning its issuance and validity. The commission shall annul any certificate issued by it, if the commission finds that the certificate was obtained by misrepresentation of any material fact relating to the education, training, or experience of the applicant. The annulment shall be pursuant to rules and regulations of the commission which shall afford due notice to the certificate holder and an opportunity to present relevant evidence for consideration by the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 26, § 1.

46-16-5.
Revision of standards.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall limit or abridge the authority of the commission to revise its standards and to issue new or additional certificates. In any such case, the director of the department of environmental management may require an applicant for a certificate to present a certificate or certificates which evidence training, education, and experience meeting the current standards of the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 26, § 1.

46-16-6.
Recognition of certificates issued by commission.

Certificates issued by the commission shall be recognized and given in connection with personnel employed in or having responsibilities for plants discharging into any waters of this state.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require any person to have a certificate in order to be employed in the operation of a sewage or other waste treatment plant. Those requirements, if any, shall be as set forth in or pursuant to other laws of this state; provided that in any case where a certificate is required, an appropriate certificate issued by the commission shall be accepted in lieu of any certificate otherwise required.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 26, § 1.

46-16-7.
Commission to act independently in some circumstances.

To the extent that the authority conferred upon the commission by this chapter is not otherwise exercisable by the commission under the provisions of the New England Interstate Water Pollution Control Compact, the commission shall not require the financial or other support of the program or programs, authorized hereby, by any state not having enacted legislation substantially similar to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 26, § 1.

46-16-8.
Water quality network.

The New England interstate water pollution control commission, hereinafter called “the commission”, in cooperation with this state and such other states signatory to the New England Interstate Water Pollution Control Compact as may participate, shall establish and maintain a water quality sampling and testing network. The network shall, to the fullest extent practicable, rely upon the sampling and testing programs of this state, the other participating states, and upon information available from agencies of the federal government, and shall not duplicate any of their activities. However, if the sampling and testing programs of this state and other states, and the information available from agencies of the federal government, are insufficient to provide the commission with records of water quality adequate for its needs, the commission may supplement the sampling and testing otherwise available to it.

Sampling pursuant to this chapter shall be at points at or near the places where waters cross a boundary of this state, and the samples shall be tested in order to determine their quality. The sampling and testing provided for herein shall be scheduled by the commission or in accordance with its requests, and shall include such factors or elements as the commission shall request. Any sampling and testing done by the water pollution control agency of this state as part of the activities of the commission’s network shall be reported fully and promptly by the agency to the commission, together with the results thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 46, § 1.

46-16-9.
Compliance with requirements for water quality.

If the commission ascertains that particular waters, at or near a boundary of this state, do not comply with the standards of the commission made pursuant to article V of the New England Interstate Water Pollution Control Compact, or are not otherwise of a quality complying with state law, the commission shall inform the water pollution control agency of this state and of any other state concerned, and shall afford the agencies an opportunity to verify, explain, supplement, or correct the information in the possession of the commission and, if the facts warrant, to take or secure the taking of any necessary remedial action.

If a remedial action is not taken or secured in a timely fashion, the commission may hold a public hearing on due notice, as provided in its rules and regulations, in order to ascertain all the relevant facts and circumstances.

Following a public hearing pursuant to subsection (b), the commission may issue an order directed to the source or sources of waste discharge causing or contributing to the deteriorated water quality. The order or orders may require reduction or cessation of waste discharges or the improvement of their quality. No order of the commission pursuant to this subsection shall be valid, unless supported by substantial evidence adduced at the public hearing.

An order of the commission made pursuant to subsection (b) shall prescribe the date or dates by which discharges of waste are to be reduced, discontinued, or treated, and may contain timetables or schedules for specific steps to be taken in order to comply therewith.

An order of the commission made pursuant to this section may be enforced in any court of competent jurisdiction. Proceedings shall be only on the record made before the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 46, § 1.

46-16-10.
Limitations.

Unless otherwise conferred by law, the commission shall not have power to issue permits or licenses in connection with the discharge or treatment of wastes, or pass upon plans or specifications for particular waste treatment or collection equipment or facilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 46, § 1.